Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is  appropriated to the Land Use Board of Appeals, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,926,784.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $33,700
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Land Use Board of Ap-
peals.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate June 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 1